North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-20 Chemical Test for Intoxication, Implied Consent
39-20-05.
Administrative hearing on request — Election to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program.

Before issuing an order of suspension, revocation, or denial under section 39-20-04 or 39-20-04.1, the director shall afford that person an opportunity for a hearing if the person mails or communicates by other means authorized by the director a request for the hearing to the director within ten days after the date of issuance of the temporary operator’s permit. Upon completion of the hearing, an individual may elect to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12. The hearing must be held within thirty days after the date of issuance of the temporary operator’s permit. If no hearing is requested within the time limits in this section, and no affidavit is submitted within the time limits under subsection 2 of section 39-20-04, and if the individual has not provided the director with written notice of election to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12, the expiration of the temporary operator’s permit serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the revocation, suspension, or denial of driving privileges in this state.

If the issue to be determined by the hearing concerns license suspension for operating a motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the hearing must be before a hearing officer assigned by the director and at a time and place designated by the director. The hearing must be recorded and its scope may cover only the issues of whether the arresting officer had reasonable grounds to believe the individual had been driving or was in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, the individual had been driving or was in actual physical control of a vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight; whether the individual was placed under arrest, unless the individual was under twenty-one years of age and the alcohol concentration was less than eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight, then arrest is not required and is not an issue under any provision of this chapter; whether the individual was tested in accordance with section 39-20-01 and, if applicable, section 39-20-02; and whether the test results show the individual had an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight. For purposes of this section, a copy of a certified copy of an analytical report of a blood or urine sample from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee, or electronically posted by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee on the crime laboratory information management system and certified by a law enforcement officer or individual who has authorized access to the crime laboratory management system through the criminal justice data information sharing system or a certified copy of the checklist and test records from a certified breath test operator, and a copy of a certified copy of a certificate of the director of the state crime laboratory designating the director’s designees, establish prima facie the alcohol concentration or the presence of drugs, or a combination thereof, shown therein.

If the issue to be determined by the hearing concerns license revocation for refusing to submit to a test under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-14, the hearing must be before a hearing officer assigned by the director at a time and place designated by the director. The hearing must be recorded. The scope of a hearing for refusing to submit to a test under section 39-20-01 may cover only the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a vehicle while having an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight; whether the person was placed under arrest; and whether that person refused to submit to the test or tests. The scope of a hearing for refusing to submit to a test under section 39-20-14 may cover only the issues of whether the law enforcement officer had reason to believe the person committed a moving traffic violation or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, whether in conjunction with the violation or the accident the officer has, through the officer’s observations, formulated an opinion that the person’s body contains alcohol and, whether the person refused to submit to the onsite screening test.

At a hearing under this section, the regularly kept records of the director and state crime laboratory may be introduced. Those records establish prima facie their contents without further foundation. For purposes of this chapter, the following are deemed regularly kept records of the director and state crime laboratory:

Any copy of a certified copy of an analytical report of a blood or urine sample received by the director from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee or electronically posted by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee on the crime laboratory information management system and certified by, and received from, a law enforcement officer or an individual who has authorized access to the crime laboratory management system through the criminal justice data information sharing system, or a certified copy of the checklist and test records received by the director from a certified breath test operator;

Any copy of a certified copy of a certificate of the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee relating to approved methods, devices, operators, materials, and checklists used for testing for alcohol concentration or the presence of drugs received by the director from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee, or that have been electronically posted with the state crime laboratory division of the attorney general at the attorney general website; and

Any copy of a certified copy of a certificate of the director of the state crime laboratory designating the director’s designees.

At the close of the hearing, the hearing officer shall notify the person of the hearing officer’s findings of fact, conclusions of law, and decision based on the findings and conclusions and shall immediately deliver to the person a copy of the decision. If the hearing officer does not find in favor of the person, the copy of the decision serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the revocation, suspension, or denial of driving privileges in this state. If the hearing officer finds, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that the person refused a test under section 39-20-01 or 39-20-14 or that the person had an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the hearing officer shall immediately take possession of the person’s temporary operator’s permit issued under this chapter. If the hearing officer does not find against the person, the hearing officer shall sign, date, and mark on the person’s permit an extension of driving privileges for the next twenty days and shall return the permit to the person. The hearing officer shall report the findings, conclusions, and decisions to the director within ten days of the conclusion of the hearing. If the hearing officer has determined in favor of the person, the director shall return the person’s operator’s license by regular mail to the address on file with the director under section 39-06-20.

If the person who requested a hearing under this section fails to appear at the hearing without justification, the right to the hearing is waived, and the hearing officer’s determination on license revocation, suspension, or denial will be based on the written request for hearing, law enforcement officer’s report, and other evidence as may be available. The hearing officer shall, on the date for which the hearing is scheduled, mail to the person, by regular mail, at the address on file with the director under section 39-06-20, or at any other address for the person or the person’s legal representative supplied in the request for hearing, a copy of the decision which serves as the director’s official notification to the person of the revocation, suspension, or denial of driving privileges in this state. Even if the person for whom the hearing is scheduled fails to appear at the hearing, the hearing is deemed to have been held on the date for which it is scheduled for purposes of appeal under section 39-20-06.

A hearing under this section may be conducted in whole or in part by telephone, television, virtual online interface, or other electronic means with the consent of the licensee. A hearing officer may provide a notice, decision, or order under this section by mail or other means as authorized by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 5; 1961, ch. 270, § 1; 1969, ch. 356, § 3; 1973, ch. 313, § 2; 1981, ch. 385, § 6; 1983, ch. 415, § 27; 1983, ch. 444, § 4; 1985, ch. 429, § 17; 1987, ch. 481, § 4; 1989, ch. 479, § 2; 1991, ch. 429, § 2; 1993, ch. 236, § 7; 1993, ch. 387, § 5; 1993, ch. 389, § 3; 1997, ch. 334, § 6; 1999, ch. 278, § 62; 1999, ch. 340, § 7; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2001, ch. 340, § 10; 2003, ch. 316, § 6; 2005, ch. 195, § 19; 2011, ch. 288, § 17; 2013, ch. 301, § 16; 2015, ch. 268, § 11, effective April 15, 2015; 2017, ch. 268, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 290, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 11 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

39-20-06.
Judicial review.

Any person whose operator’s license or privilege has been suspended, revoked, or denied by the decision of the hearing officer under section 39-20-05 may appeal within seven days after the date of the hearing under section 39-20-05 as shown by the date of the hearing officer’s decision, section 28-32-42 notwithstanding, by serving on the director and filing a notice of appeal and specifications of error in the district court in the county where the events occurred for which the demand for a test was made, or in the county in which the administrative hearing was held. The court shall set the matter for hearing, and the petitioner shall give twenty days’ notice of the hearing to the director and to the hearing officer who rendered the decision. Neither the director nor the court may stay the decision pending decision on appeal. Within twenty days after receipt of the notice of appeal, the director or the hearing officer who rendered the decision shall file in the office of the clerk of court to which the appeal is taken a certified transcript of the testimony and all other proceedings. It is the record on which the appeal must be determined. No additional evidence may be heard. The court shall affirm the decision of the director or hearing officer unless it finds the evidence insufficient to warrant the conclusion reached by the director or hearing officer. The court may direct that the matter be returned to the director or hearing officer for rehearing and the presentation of additional evidence.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 6; 1961, ch. 270, § 2; 1973, ch. 313, § 3; 1983, ch. 415, § 28; 1985, ch. 429, § 18; 1987, ch. 460, § 14; 1993, ch. 394, § 1; 2001, ch. 293, § 18.

39-20-07.
Interpretation of chemical tests.

Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any individual while driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, or a combination thereof, evidence of the amount of alcohol concentration or presence of other drugs, or a combination thereof, in the individual’s blood, breath, or urine at the time of the act alleged as shown by a chemical analysis of the blood, breath, or urine is admissible. For the purpose of this section:

An individual having, at that time, an alcohol concentration of not more than five one-hundredths of one percent by weight is presumed not to be under the influence of intoxicating liquor. This presumption has no application to the administration of chapter 39-06.2.

Evidence that there was at that time more than five one-hundredths of one percent by weight alcohol concentration in an individual is relevant evidence, but it is not to be given prima facie effect in indicating whether the individual was under the influence of intoxicating liquor.

An individual having an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent by weight or, with respect to an individual under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of the performance of a chemical test within two hours after driving or being in physical control of a vehicle is under the influence of intoxicating liquor at the time of driving or being in physical control of a vehicle.

Alcohol concentration is based upon grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of end expiratory breath or grams of alcohol per sixty-seven milliliters of urine.

The results of the chemical analysis must be received in evidence when it is shown that the sample was properly obtained and the test was fairly administered, and if the test is shown to have been performed according to methods and with devices approved by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee, and by an individual possessing a certificate of qualification to administer the test issued by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee. The director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee is authorized to approve satisfactory devices and methods of chemical analysis and determine the qualifications of individuals to conduct such analysis, and shall issue a certificate to all qualified operators who exhibit the certificate upon demand of the individual requested to take the chemical test.

The director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee may appoint, train, certify, and supervise field inspectors of breath testing equipment and its operation, and the inspectors shall report the findings of any inspection to the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee for appropriate action. Upon approval of the methods or devices, or both, required to perform the tests and the individuals qualified to administer them, the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee shall prepare, certify, and electronically post a written record of the approval with the state crime laboratory division of the attorney general at the attorney general website, and shall include in the record:

An annual register of the specific testing devices currently approved, including serial number, location, and the date and results of last inspection.

An annual register of currently qualified and certified operators of the devices, stating the date of certification and its expiration.

The operational checklist and forms prescribing the methods currently approved by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee in using the devices during the administration of the tests.

The certificate of the director of the state crime laboratory designating the director’s designees.

The certified records electronically posted under this section may be supplemented when the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee determines it to be necessary, and any certified supplemental records have the same force and effect as the records that are supplemented.

The state crime laboratory shall make the certified records required by this section available for download in a printable format on the attorney general website.

Copies of the state crime laboratory certified records referred to in subsections 5 and 6 that have been electronically posted with the state crime laboratory division of the attorney general at the attorney general website must be admitted as prima facie evidence of the matters stated in the records.

A certified copy of the analytical report of a blood or urine analysis referred to in subsection 5 and which is issued by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee must be accepted as prima facie evidence of the results of a chemical analysis performed under this chapter. The certified copy satisfies the directives of subsection 5.

Superseded by N.D.R.Ev., Rule 707.

A law enforcement officer who has witnessed an individual who is medically qualified to draw the blood sample for testing may sign a verified statement that the law enforcement officer witnessed the individual draw the blood sample and the individual followed the approved methods of the state toxicologist. Further foundation is not required to establish that the blood sample was drawn according to the approved method of the state toxicologist.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 7; 1961, ch. 269, § 3; 1965, ch. 281, § 1; 1969, ch. 357, § 1; 1969, ch. 358, § 1; 1975, ch. 359, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 29; 1983, ch. 444, § 5; 1985, ch. 429, § 19; 1989, ch. 461, § 5; 1993, ch. 236, § 8; 1993, ch. 383, § 14; 1993, ch. 387, § 6; 1997, ch. 334, § 7; 1997, ch. 345, § 1; 1997, ch. 346, § 1; 1999, ch. 278, § 63; 1999, ch. 358, § 8; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2003, ch. 316, § 7; 2003, ch. 469, § 11; 2005, ch. 195, § 20; 2007, ch. 339, § 3; 2007, ch. 325, § 5; 2011, ch. 288, § 18; 2013, ch. 301, §§ 17–19.

39-20-08.
Proof of refusal admissible in any civil or criminal action or proceeding.

If the person under arrest refuses to submit to the test or tests, proof of refusal is admissible in any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the person was driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, or a combination thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 8; 1983, ch. 415, § 30; 1983, ch. 444, § 6.

39-20-09.
Effect of evidence of chemical test.

This chapter does not limit the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing on the question of whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, or a combination thereof, but, if the test results show an alcohol concentration of at least eight one-hundredths of one percent or, with respect to a person under twenty-one years of age, an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight, the purpose of such evidence must be limited to the issues of probable cause, whether an arrest was made prior to the administering of the test, and the validity of the test results.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 9; 1983, ch. 415, § 31; 1983, ch. 444, § 7; 1993, ch. 387, § 7; 1997, ch. 334, § 8; 2003, ch. 316, § 8.

39-20-10.
Notice to other states.

When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this chapter that a nonresident’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been revoked or denied, the director shall give information in writing of the action taken to the official in charge of traffic control or public safety of the state of the person’s residence and of any state in which the person has a license.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 10.

39-20-11.
Application to prosecutions under municipal ordinances.

The provisions of this chapter also apply to prosecutions for the violation of municipal ordinances prohibiting the driving or control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, or a combination thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 11; 1983, ch. 444, § 8.

39-20-12.
Liability.

Any individual medically qualified to draw blood or any licensed physician, nurse, technician, or an employee of a hospital who draws blood from any person pursuant to a request of any arresting officer is not liable in any civil action for damages arising out of said act except for gross negligence.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 269, § 4; 1987, ch. 73, § 24; 1999, ch. 358, § 9.

39-20-13.
State crime laboratory to examine specimens of fatalities in accidental deaths involving a motor vehicle — Record use.

In cases of death resulting from a motor vehicle accident or other unnatural death occurring in a motor vehicle, the county coroner shall require that specimens of blood, urine, and vitreous humor be withdrawn from the body of the decedent within twenty-four hours after the decedent’s death by a coroner, coroner’s physician, or other qualified person, prior to embalming. The specimens must be collected and preserved by methods and techniques established by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee. The specimens so drawn must be sent to the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee for analysis for alcohol, carbon monoxide, and other drug content. The director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee shall keep a record of all such examinations to be used for statistical purposes. The records must be made available to the director for use by the national highway traffic safety administration in analyzing fatal accidents. The information in the possession of the director may be obtained from the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee only as provided in this section. Except as provided, the results of the examinations referred to in this section must be used only for statistical purposes, except that the results must be released upon the issuance of a subpoena duces tecum by a court of competent jurisdiction in any civil or criminal action. The cumulative results of the examinations, without identifying the individuals involved, must be disseminated to interested state and local officials and made public by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee. Any person drawing the specimens and any person making any examination under the terms of this section are immune from all liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 359, § 1; 1973, ch. 314, § 1; 1985, ch. 429, § 20; 1985, ch. 443, § 1; 2005, ch. 195, § 21.

39-20-14.
Screening tests.

Any individual who operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways of this state is deemed to have given consent to submit to an onsite screening test or tests of the individual’s breath for the purpose of estimating the alcohol concentration in the individual’s breath upon the request of a law enforcement officer who has reason to believe that the individual committed a moving traffic violation or a violation under section 39-08-01 or an equivalent offense, or was involved in a traffic accident as a driver, and in conjunction with the violation or the accident the officer has, through the officer’s observations, formulated an opinion that the individual’s body contains alcohol.

An individual may not be required to submit to a screening test or tests of breath while at a hospital as a patient if the medical practitioner in immediate charge of the individual’s case is not first notified of the proposal to make the requirement, or objects to the test or tests on the ground that such would be prejudicial to the proper care or treatment of the patient.

The screening test or tests must be performed by an enforcement officer certified as a chemical test operator by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee and according to methods and with devices approved by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee. The results of such screening test must be used only for determining whether or not a further test shall be given under the provisions of section 39-20-01. The officer shall inform the individual that North Dakota law requires the individual to take the screening test to determine whether the individual is under the influence of alcohol and that refusal of the individual to submit to a screening test may result in a revocation for at least one hundred eighty days and up to three years of that individual’s driving privileges. If such individual refuses to submit to such screening test or tests, none may be given, but such refusal is admissible in a court proceeding if the individual was arrested in violation of section 39-08-01 and did not take any additional chemical tests requested by the law enforcement officer. Such refusal is sufficient cause to revoke such individual’s license or permit to drive in the same manner as provided in section 39-20-04, and a hearing as provided in section 39-20-05 and a judicial review as provided in section 39-20-06 must be available.

The director must not revoke an individual’s driving privileges for refusing to submit to a screening test requested under this section if the individual provides a sufficient breath, blood, or urine sample for a chemical test requested under section 39-20-01 for the same incident.

No provisions of this section may supersede any provisions of chapter 39-20, nor may any provision of chapter 39-20 be construed to supersede this section except as provided herein.

For the purposes of this section, “chemical test operator” means an individual certified by the director of the state crime laboratory or the director’s designee as qualified to perform analysis for alcohol in an individual’s blood, breath, or urine.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 383, § 1; 1973, ch. 315, § 1; 1977, ch. 367, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 32; 1985, ch. 429, § 21; 1989, ch. 479, § 3; 2005, ch. 195, § 22; 2007, ch. 325, § 6; 2011, ch. 288, § 19; 2013, ch. 301, § 20; 2017, ch. 268, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 322, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

39-20-15.
Restricted license upon twenty-four seven sobriety program participation.

Any driver suspended under this chapter may elect to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12. The director may issue a temporary restricted license that takes effect after fourteen days of the suspension have been served provided that the driver is not subject to any unrelated suspension. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may not receive a temporary restricted operator’s license until after fourteen days after the administrative hearing on the offense under this chapter has been waived or held, or after fourteen days of the final appeal, whichever is longer.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 301, § 21; 2015, ch. 268, § 12, effective April 15, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.